en: Longline fishing
de: Langleinenfischerei
fi: Pitkäsiimalla kalastettu
fr: Pêché à la palangre, Pêchés à la palangre, Pêchée à la palangre, Pêchées à la palangre
pt: Pesca com espinel, pesca com espinhel, pesca com trole, Ppesca com palangre, pesca de espinel, pesca de espinhel, pesca de trole, Ppesca de palangre

en: Gillnet fishing
de: Gillnetz-Fischen
es: Pesca con redes de enmalle, pesca con red de enmalle
fr: Pêché au filet maillant, Pêchés au filet maillant, Pêché aux filets maillants, Pêchés aux filets maillants, Pêchée au filet maillant, Pêchées au filet maillant
it: Pesca con reti a maglia, pesca con rete a maglia
nl: Gillnetvissen
pt: Pesca com redes de emalhar, pesca com rede de emalhar

en: Lift net fishing, Lifting net fishing
de: Lift Netz Fischerei
fr: Pêché au filet soulevé, Pêchés au filet soulevé, Pêché aux filets soulevés, Pêchés aux filets soulevés, Pêchée au filet soulevé, Pêchées au filet soulevé

en: Hand fishing
ca: Pescat manualment
de: Handfischen
fi: Käsin kalastettu
fr: Pêché à la main, Pêchés à la main, Pêchée à la main, Pêchées à la main
he: דיג ידני
pt: Pesca à mão, pesca manual

en: Blast fished, blast fishing
de: Dynamitfischen
fi: dynamiittikalastettu
fr: Pêché à la dynamite
pt: Pesca com dinamite, pescado com dinamite

en: Pair trawling
fi: Paritroolattu
fr: Pêché à deux chaluts

fr: Pêché au poison
pt: Pesca com veneno

en: cormorant fishing
de: Kormoranfischerei
eo: Kormorana fiŝkaptado
fi: merimetsokalastettu
fr: pêche au cormoran, peche au cormoran
ja: 鵜飼い
nl: aalscholvervisserij, visserij met aalscholvers
pt: Pesca com cormorão, pesca com corvo-marinho
ta: தூண்டில் பறவைகள்
te: కార్మోరాంట్ ఫిషింగ్
th: การจับปลาของนกกาน้ำ
vi: Đánh cá bằng chim cốc
zh: 鸬鹚捕鱼

en: Sustainable
da: Bæredygtig
de: Nachhaltig
es: Sostenible
hr: Održiv
it: Sostenibile
nl: Duurzaam
pt: Sustentável
sv: Hållbar, Hållbart, Hållbart producerat och certifierad

en: Sustainable fishery, Sustainable fishing, Sustainable Seafood
bg: Устойчив риболов
ca: Piscifactoria sostenible, Pesca sostenible, Marisc sostenible
de: Nachhaltige Fischerei
es: Pesca sostenible
fi: Kestävä kalastus
fr: Pêche durable, pêches durables
he: דיג מקיים
hr: održiv ribolov
hu: Fenntartható halászat
it: Pesca sostenibile
nl: Duurzame visserij
pl: Zrównoważone rybołówstwo
pt: Pesca sustentável

en: Sustainable Seafood MSC, sustainable food msc
xx: MSC, Marine Stewardship Council
bg: Устойчива морска храна MSC
ca: Marisc sostenible MSC, MSC, Consell per la Protecció Marina
de: Zertifizierte nachhaltige Fischerei MSC, MSC zertifiziert
es: Certificado MSC de pesca sostenible, Pesca sostenible MSC
fi: MSC-sertifioitu, MSC-sertifioidusta
fr: Pêche durable MSC, certifié MSC, certifiée MSC, certifiés MSC, certifiées MSC, labellisé MSC, labellisée MSC, labellisés MSC, labellisées MSC
it: Frutti di Mare Sostenibili MSC
nl: Duurzaam Zeevruchten MSC

en: Responsible aquaculture
ca: Aqüicultura responsable
de: Verantwortliche Aquakultur
es: Aquicultura responsable
fi: Vastuullinen kalatalous, vastuullinen vesiviljely
fr: Aquaculture responsable
hr: Odgovorna akvakultura
it: Acuacoltura responsabile
nl: Verantwoorde aquacultuur
pt: Aquacultura sustentável

en: Responsible aquaculture ASC
xx: ASC, Aquaculture Stewardship Council
ca: Aqüicultura responsable ASC
de: ASC
es: ASC Acuicultura responsable
fi: ASC -vastuullinen kalatalous
fr: Aquaculture responsable ASC
hr: Odgovorna akvakultura certifikat ASC
it: Acquacoltura responsabile ASC
nl: Verantwoorde aquacultuur ASC

en: Tesco Nurture, Nurture
fi: Tesco Nurture

en: Sustainable farming, sustainable agriculture
bg: Устойчиво земеделие
ca: Agricultura Sostenible
cs: Udržitelné zemědělství
da: Bæredygtigt landbrug, fra bæredygtigt landbrug, bæredygtigt dyrkede ingredienser
de: Nachhaltige Agrikultur
es: Agricultura sustentable
fi: Kestävä maatalous, kestävän kehityksen mukaisesti kasvatettuja
fr: Agriculture durable, agriculture soutenable, agriculture raisonnée, culture durable, culture soutenable, culture raisonnée
he: חקלאות בת־קיימא
hr: održiva poljoprivreda
hu: Fenntartható gazdálkodás, Fenntartható gazdálkodásból
it: Agricoltura sostenibile
nb: Bærekraftigt jordbrug, fra bærekraftigt jordbrug, bærekraftig dyrkede ingredienser
nl: Duurzame landbouw
pl: Zrównoważone rolnictwo
pt: Agricultura sustentável
sv: Hållbart jordbruk, från hållbart jordbruk, hållbart odlade ingredienser

en: UTZ Certified, UTZ
xx: UTZ Certified
ca: Certificat UTZ
cs: UTZ certifikováno
de: UTZ Zertifiziert, UTZ
es: Certificado UTZ
fi: UTZ-sertifioitu, UTZ
fr: Certifié UTZ
hu: UTZ Certified, UTZ, UTZ tanúsítás, UTZ tanúsítvány
it: Certificato UTZ, UTZ
nl: UTZ Gecertificeerd

en: UTZ Certified Cocoa, UTZ Certified Cacao
xx: UTZ Certified Cocoa
ca: Cacau certificat UTZ
de: UTZ Zertifizierter Kakao, UTZ Certified Kakao
fi: UTZ-sertifioitua kaakaota
fr: Cacao certifié UTZ
hu: UTZ Certified Cocoa, UTZ Certified Cacao, UTZ tanúsított kakaó
it: Cacao certificato UTZ
nl: UTZ gecertificeerde cacao
pl: UTZ Certified KaKao
pt: Certificado UTZ cacau, cacau certificado UTZ

en: UTZ Certified Coffee
xx: UTZ Certified Coffee
ca: Cafè amb certificat UTZ
de: UTZ Certified Kaffee
es: Café certificado UTZ
fi: UTZ-sertifioitua kahvia
fr: Café certifié UTZ
hu: UTZ Certified Coffee, UTZ tanúsított kávé
it: Caffè certificato UTZ, Caffe certificato UTZ
pl: UTZ Certified Kawa
pt: Certificado UTZ café, cafécertificado UTZ

en: UTZ Certified Hazelnut
xx: UTZ Certified Hazelnut
nl: UTZ Certified Hazelnoot

en: UTZ Certified Tea
nl: UTZ Certified Thee, UTZ Gecertificeerd Thee